src/fst/affixes/numerals.lexc
LEXICON num_C_sub
!! ** Lexicon **@LEXNAME@** for numerusmorfologi for ord på konsonant, substandarformer
+Err/Sub+Num+Abs: # ; !!= - **@CODE@**  
+Err/Sub+Num+Abs+Pl:%>	Krestr ; !!= - **@CODE@**  
+Err/Sub+Num+Abs+Sg+3SgPoss:%>ia	Krestr ; !!= - **@CODE@**  
+Err/Sub+Num+Abs+Sg+3SgPoss:%>%TRUNCa	Krestr ; !!= - **@CODE@**  
+Err/Sub+Num+Abs+Sg+3PlPoss:%>iat	Krestr ; !!= - **@CODE@**  
+Err/Sub+Num+Abs+Sg+3PlPoss:%>%TRUNCat	Krestr ; !!= - **@CODE@**   1-at
+Err/Sub+Num+Abs+Pl+3SgPoss:%>%TRUNCi	K_plur ; !!= - **@CODE@**  
+Err/Sub+Num+Abs+Pl+3PlPoss:%>%TRUNCi	K_plur ; !!= - **@CODE@**  
+Err/Sub+Num+Rel:%>ip	Krestr ; !!= - **@CODE@**  
+Err/Sub+Num+Rel:%>%TRUNCp	Krestr ; !!= - **@CODE@**  
+Err/Sub+Num+Rel+Sg+3SgPoss:%>iata	Krestr ; !! - ...
+Err/Sub+Num+Rel+Sg+3SgPoss:%>%TRUNCata	Krestr ;
+Err/Sub+Num+Rel+Sg+3PlPoss:%>iata	Krestr ;
+Err/Sub+Num+Rel+Sg+3PlPoss:%>%TRUNCata	Krestr ;
+Err/Sub+Num+Rel+Pl+3SgPoss:%>isa	K_plur ;
+Err/Sub+Num+Rel+Pl+3SgPoss:%>%TRUNCisa	K_plur ;
+Err/Sub+Num+Rel+Pl+3PlPoss:%>isa	K_plur ;
+Err/Sub+Num+Rel+Pl+3PlPoss:%>%TRUNCisa	K_plur ;
+Err/Sub+Num+Lok:%>imi	LokVb ; !!= - **@CODE@**  
+Err/Sub+Num+Lok:%>%TRUNCmi	LokVb ; !!= - **@CODE@**  
+Err/Sub+Num+Lok:%>mi	LokVb ; !!= - **@CODE@**  
+Err/Sub+Num+Lok:%>ini	LokVb ; !!= - **@CODE@**  
+Err/Sub+Num+Lok:%>%TRUNCni	LokVb ; !!= - **@CODE@**  
+Err/Sub+Num+Lok:%>ni	LokVb ; !!= - **@CODE@**  
+Err/Sub+Num+Lok+Sg+3SgPoss:%>iani	LokVb ; !!= - **@CODE@**  
+Err/Sub+Num+Lok+Sg+3SgPoss:%>%TRUNCani	LokVb ; !!= - **@CODE@**  
+Err/Sub+Num+Lok+Sg+3PlPoss:%>ianni	LokVb ; !!= - **@CODE@**  
+Err/Sub+Num+Lok+Sg+3PlPoss:%>%TRUNCanni	LokVb ; !!= - **@CODE@**   1-anni
+Err/Sub+Num+Lok+Pl+3SgPoss:%>iini	LokVb ; !!= - **@CODE@**  
+Err/Sub+Num+Lok+Pl+3SgPoss:%>%TRUNCini	LokVb ; !!= - **@CODE@**  
+Err/Sub+Num+Lok+Pl+3PlPoss:%>iini	LokVb ; !!= - **@CODE@**  
+Err/Sub+Num+Lok+Pl+3PlPoss:%>%TRUNCini	LokVb ; !! ---
+Err/Sub+Num+Ins:%>imik	Krestr ;
+Err/Sub+Num+Ins:%>%TRUNCmik	Krestr ;
+Err/Sub+Num+Ins:%>mik	Krestr ;
+Err/Sub+Num+Ins:%>inik	K_plur ;
+Err/Sub+Num+Ins:%>%TRUNCnik	K_plur ;
+Err/Sub+Num+Ins:%>nik	K_plur ;
+Err/Sub+Num+Trm:%>imut	TrmVb ;
+Err/Sub+Num+Trm:%>%TRUNCmut	TrmVb ;
+Err/Sub+Num+Trm:%>mut	TrmVb ;
+Err/Sub+Num+Trm:%>inut	TrmVb ;
+Err/Sub+Num+Trm:%>%TRUNCnut	TrmVb ;
+Err/Sub+Num+Trm:%>nut	TrmVb ;
+Err/Sub+Num+Trm+Sg+3SgPoss:%>ianut	TrmVb ;
+Err/Sub+Num+Trm+Sg+3SgPoss:%>%TRUNCanut	TrmVb ;
+Err/Sub+Num+Trm+Sg+3PlPoss:%>iannut   TrmVb ;
+Err/Sub+Num+Trm+Sg+3PlPoss:%>%TRUNCannut   TrmVb ;
+Err/Sub+Num+Trm+Pl+3SgPoss:%>iinut    TrmVb ;
+Err/Sub+Num+Trm+Pl+3SgPoss:%>%TRUNCinut    TrmVb ;
+Err/Sub+Num+Trm+Pl+3PlPoss:%>iinut    TrmVb ;
+Err/Sub+Num+Trm+Pl+3PlPoss:%>%TRUNCinut    TrmVb ;
+Err/Sub+Num+Abl:%>imit	AblVb ;
+Err/Sub+Num+Abl:%>%TRUNCmit	AblVb ;
+Err/Sub+Num+Abl:%>mit	AblVb ;
+Err/Sub+Num+Abl:%>imiit	Krestr ;
+Err/Sub+Num+Abl:%>%TRUNCmiit	Krestr ;
+Err/Sub+Num+Abl:%>miit	Krestr ;
+Err/Sub+Num+Abl:%>init	AblVb ;
+Err/Sub+Num+Abl:%>%TRUNCnit	AblVb ;
+Err/Sub+Num+Abl:%>nit	AblVb ;
+Err/Sub+Num+Abl+Sg+3SgPoss:%>ianit	AblVb ;
+Err/Sub+Num+Abl+Sg+3SgPoss:%>%TRUNCanit	AblVb ;
+Err/Sub+Num+Abl+Sg+3PlPoss:%>iannit	AblVb ;
+Err/Sub+Num+Abl+Sg+3PlPoss:%>%TRUNCannit	AblVb ;
+Err/Sub+Num+Abl+Pl+3SgPoss:%>iinit	AblVb ;
+Err/Sub+Num+Abl+Pl+3SgPoss:%>%TRUNCinit	AblVb ;
+Err/Sub+Num+Abl+Pl+3PlPoss:%>iinit	AblVb ;
+Err/Sub+Num+Abl+Pl+3PlPoss:%>%TRUNCinit	AblVb ;
+Err/Sub+Num+Aeq:%>itut	Krestr ;
+Err/Sub+Num+Aeq:%>%TRUNCtut	Krestr ;
+Err/Sub+Num+Aeq:%>tut	Krestr ;
+Err/Sub+Num+Via:%>ikkut	ZkkutZ ;
+Err/Sub+Num+Via:%>%TRUNCkkut	ZkkutZ ;
+Err/Sub+Num+U+Gram/IV+Der/nv:%>iu	IV_voq ;
+Err/Sub+Num+U+Gram/IV+Der/nv:%>%TRUNCu	IV_voq ;
+Err/Sub+Num+INNAQ+Der/nn:%>innaq	tup- ;
+Err/Sub+Num+KKUT+Der/nn:%>ikkut ZkkutZ ;
+Err/Sub+Num+KKUT+Der/nn:%>%TRUNCkkut ZkkutZ ;
+Err/Sub+Num+KKUUTAAR+Der/nv:%>ikkuutaar flex-iv ;
+Err/Sub+Num+KKUUTAAR+Der/nv:%>%TRUNCkkuutaar flex-iv ;
+Err/Sub+Num+KKUUTAAR+Der/nv:%>ikkuutaar flex-tv ;
+Err/Sub+Num+KKUUTAAR+Der/nv:%>%TRUNCkkuutaar flex-tv ;
+Err/Sub+Num+KKUUTAAQ+Der/nn:%>ikkuutaat	tptmorf ;
+Err/Sub+Num+KKUUTAAQ+Der/nn:%>%TRUNCkkuutaat	tptmorf ;
+Err/Sub+Num+LIR+Der/nv:%>iler	HTR_ir_GAQ_i ;
+Err/Sub+Num+LIR+Der/nv:%>%TRUNCler	HTR_ir_GAQ_i ;
+Err/Sub+Num+LLUINNAQ+Der/nv:%>luinnaq	tup- ;
+Err/Sub+Num+LLUINNAQ+Der/nv:%>%TRUNCrluinnaq	tup- ;
+Err/Sub+Num+LLUINNAQ+Der/nv+NGAJAK+Der/nv:%>luinnangajak	tup- ;
+Err/Sub+Num+LLUINNAQ+Der/nv+NGAJAK+Der/nv:%>%TRUNCrluinnangajak	tup- ;
+Err/Sub+Num+NNGUR+Der/nv:%>inngor	IV_r ;
+Err/Sub+Num+NNGUR+Der/nv:%>%TRUNCnngor	IV_r ;
+Err/Sub+Num+NNGUR+Der/nv:%>inngor	TV ;
+Err/Sub+Num+NNGUR+Der/nv:%>%TRUNCnngor	TV ;
+Err/Sub+Num+QAR+Der/nv:%>eqar	IV_voq ;
+Err/Sub+Num+QAR+Der/nv:%>%TRUNCqar	IV_voq ;
+Err/Sub+Num+R+Der/nv:%>er XIirXmorf ;
+Err/Sub+Num+R+Der/nv:%>%TRUNCr XIirXmorf ;
+Err/Sub+Num+RAAR+Der/nv:%>eraar	IV_r ;
+Err/Sub+Num+RAAR+Der/nv:%>%TRUNCraar	IV_r ;
+Err/Sub+Num+RIAR+Der/nv:%>eriar	IV_r ;
+Err/Sub+Num+RIAR+Der/nv:%>%TRUNCriar	IV_r ;
+Err/Sub+Num+RIAR+Der/nv:%>eriar	TV ;
+Err/Sub+Num+RIAR+Der/nv:%>%TRUNCriar	TV ;
+Err/Sub+Num+RIAAT+Der/nn:%>eriaat	tptmorf ;
+Err/Sub+Num+RIAAT+Der/nn:%>%TRUNCriaat	tptmorf ;
+Err/Sub+Num+VVAARIK+Der/nn:%>iffaarik tup- ;
+Err/Sub+Num+VVAARIK+Der/nn:%>%TRUNCffaarik tup- ;
